Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.1701

Purchasing retirement pension coverage—Criteria.

(1) At any time prior to or upon retiring and prior to receiving any pension disbursements, a participant is allowed to:

(a) Purchase retirement pension coverage as provided in subsection (2) of this section for years of service credited prior to their enrollment in the pension system, and for which reinstatement of years of service is not available under RCW 41.24.040; or

(b) Purchase retirement pension coverage as provided in subsection (2) of this section for years of service that were lost due to the withdrawal of pension fees.

(2) The participant and/or the municipality must make payment for the purchase of retirement pension coverage by paying the actuarial value of the resulting benefit increase in a manner defined by the state board.

(3) Retirement pension coverage may only be purchased for the period in which service was performed as defined in RCW 41.24.010(9) and in a manner consistent with this section.

[ 2012 c 239 s 1.]